Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 7. Professional Corporations.
§ 13.1-549.
Qualifications of shareholders; special provisions for corporations rendering services of architects, professional engineers, landscape architects and land surveyors, and using the title of certified interior designers.

A corporation rendering the services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects, or using the title of certified interior designers, or any combination thereof, shall issue not less than two-thirds of its shares to individuals or professional business entities duly licensed to render the services of architect, professional engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect, or to individuals legally authorized to use the title of certified interior designer, and the remainder of said shares may be issued only to and held by individuals who are employees of the corporation whether or not such employees are licensed to render professional services or authorized to use a title. For a corporation using the title of certified interior designers and providing the services of architects, professional engineers or land surveyors, or any combination thereof, not less than two-thirds of its shares shall be held by individuals or professional business entities who are duly licensed. No other professional corporation, except for a corporation engaged in the practice of accounting as described in §

13.1-549.1

, may issue any of its shares to anyone other than an individual or professional business entity who is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services as those for which the corporation was incorporated, including trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan. Notwithstanding the above limitations, a professional corporation may (i) issue its shares to a partnership each of the partners of which is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as those for which the corporation was incorporated or (ii) issue any of its shares to, and have as shareholders, directly or indirectly, whether through shares, fractional shares, or rights or options to purchase shares, the trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan.

As an additional prerequisite for a corporation engaging in the practice of the professions of architecture, professional engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture, or using the title of certified interior designer, or any combination thereof, such corporation shall secure a certificate of authority, which may be renewable and may be either general or limited, from the Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, Certified Interior Designers and Landscape Architects. Such certificate of authority shall be issued or renewed by the Board when in its discretion such corporation is in compliance with rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the said Board consistent with its jurisdiction to provide adequate safeguards for the public’s health, welfare and safety. The fees for a certificate of authority as described above shall be the same fees as provided for in Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Title 54.1.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1972, c. 655; 1980, c. 757; 1998, c. 27; 2000, cc. 191, 763; 2006, cc. 672, 715; 2008, c. 265; 2009, c. 309.

The 1998 amendment

deleted “State” preceding “Board” throughout this section; substituted “employees are licensed” for “employees be licensed” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, inserted “Certified Interior Designers” in the first sentence and substituted “Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Title 54.1” for “Chapter 4 of Title 54.1 of the Code” in the last sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 191 inserted “except for a corporation engaged in the practice of accounting as described in §

13.1-549.1

,” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2000 amendment by c. 763 rewrote the first sentence of the first paragraph, inserting references to certified interior designers, added the second sentence of the first paragraph, and in the first sentence of the second paragraph, inserted “or using the title of” preceding “certified landscape” and substituted “architect or certified interior designer” for “architect” thereafter, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 672 and 715 are identical, and added the subsection designations; in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “shares” for “capital stock” following “two-thirds of its” and “shares” for “stock” following “remainder of said”; in the second sentence, substituted “a corporation” for “those corporations” and “its shares” for “the capital stock of the corporation”; in the third sentence, substituted “shares” for “capital stock” and added “including trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan”; in the fourth sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, substituted “shares” for “stock” following “issue its” and added clause (ii); in the first sentence in subsection B, substituted “As an additional” for “It is further provided, as an additional” and deleted “that” following “combination thereof”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 265, in subsection A, inserted “or professional business entities” in the first and second sentences and “or professional business entity” in the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 309, in subsection A, inserted “or landscape architects‘ and “or landscape architect” and deleted “certified landscape architects or‘ preceding “certified interior designers‘ and “certified landscape architect or‘ preceding “certified interior designer‘; inserted “or landscape architecture” and deleted “certified landscape architect or‘ preceding “certified interior designer‘ in subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-549.1.
Special provision for corporation engaged in practice of accounting.

Before any professional corporation may engage in the practice of accounting in this Commonwealth it shall first obtain and maintain any registration required for such corporation by Chapter 44 (§

54.1-4400

et seq.) of Title 54.1. A corporation rendering the services of accounting shall issue not less than fifty-one percent of its shares to individuals or professional business entities duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the services of accounting, including trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan, and the remainder of said shares may be issued only to and held by individuals who are employees of the corporation, whether or not such employees are licensed or otherwise authorized to render professional services.

History.

1972, c. 180; 2000, c. 191; 2006, cc. 672, 715; 2008, c. 265.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 191 inserted the reference to §

54.1-2000

et seq. (now §

54.1-4400

et seq.) in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 672 and 715 are identical, and in the second sentence, substituted “shares” for “capital stock” preceding “to individuals,” inserted “including trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan” and substituted “shares” for “stock” preceding “may be issued.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 265 inserted “or professional business entities” following “shares to individuals” in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-549.2.
Registration certificate required for corporation engaged in practice of law.

Before any professional corporation may engage in the practice of law in this Commonwealth, it shall first obtain and maintain a registration certificate required for such corporation by Chapter 39 of Title 54.1. Any such professional corporation which has been issued a certificate of incorporation before June 1, 1973, shall be issued a registration certificate upon the payment of the required fee and upon compliance with §

54.1-3902

on or before January 1, 1974.

History.

1973, c. 484.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1412 (1973).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Foreign business trust need not obtain certificate of authority before filing fictitious name certificate. —

A foreign business trust is not required to obtain a certificate of authority before filing a fictitious name certificate as a foreign business trust is not included within definitions of business entities required to obtain either a certificate of authority or certificate of registration. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Clerk, Circuit Court of Fairfax County, 00-039, 2000 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (6/12/00).

§ 13.1-549.3.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 349.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-549.3

, relating to special provisions for law corporations as to qualifications of shareholders, was enacted by Acts 1984, c. 448.

§ 13.1-550.
Transfer of shares.

No shareholder of a corporation organized under this chapter may sell or transfer his shares in such corporation except to (i) the corporation, (ii) another individual or professional business entity who is eligible to be a shareholder of such corporation, (iii) a qualified charitable remainder trust as defined in subsection B, or (iv) the trustees of an eligible employee stock ownership plan. In the case of a corporation rendering the services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors and certified landscape architects, or any combination thereof, no person who is not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render one such service shall be eligible unless at least two-thirds of the remaining shares after the sale or transfer shall be held by individuals or professional business entities duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to perform one such service.

As used in this section, “qualified charitable remainder trust” means a trust meeting the requirements of § 664 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and which meets all of the following conditions:

Has one or more current income beneficiaries, all of which are eligible to be a shareholder in the corporation under §

13.1-544

.

Has a trustee or independent special trustee who:

Is eligible to be a shareholder in the corporation under §

13.1-544

; and

Has exclusive authority over the shares of the corporation while the shares are held in the trust.

Has one or more irrevocably designated charitable remaindermen, all of which must at all times be domiciled or maintain a local chapter in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

When transferring any assets during the term of the trust to charitable organizations, the distributions are made only to charitable organizations described in § 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code that are domiciled or maintain a local chapter in this Commonwealth.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1980, c. 757; 1999, c. 100; 2006, cc. 672, 715; 2008, c. 265.

The 1999 amendment

inserted the subsection A designator at the beginning of the first paragraph, and inserted “or to a qualified charitable remainder trust as described in subsection B” in the first sentence of subsection A, and added subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 672 and 715 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the clause designations; substituted “the” for “said” in clause (i), “defined” for “described” in clause (iii), added clause (iv) and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 265, in subsection A, inserted “or professional business entity” in clause (i) and substituted “individuals or professional business entities” for “persons” in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-551.
Disqualification of shareholder.

If any officer, shareholder, agent or employee of a corporation organized under this chapter who has been rendering professional service to the public becomes legally disqualified to render such professional services within this Commonwealth, he shall immediately sever all employment with, and financial interests in such corporation except that he may be a shareholder subject to the provisions of this chapter. A corporation’s failure to require compliance with this provision shall constitute a ground for the forfeiture of its articles of incorporation and the termination of its corporate existence by the State Corporation Commission.

History.

1970, c. 77; 2002, c. 77.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 77 substituted “the termination of its corporate existence” for “its dissolution” near the end of the section.

§ 13.1-552.
Conversion into nonprofessional corporation; disposition of shares of deceased or disqualified shareholders.

A corporation under this chapter shall have perpetual existence until its corporate existence is terminated in accordance with other provisions of this title.

Whenever all shareholders of a corporation licensed under this chapter cease at any one time and for any reason to be licensed, certified or registered in the particular field of endeavor for which the corporation was organized, or by the vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its outstanding capital stock, the corporation thereupon shall be treated as converted into, and shall operate henceforth solely as, a corporation under applicable provisions of this title, exclusive of this chapter, but may be reconverted upon removal of the disability or by the vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its outstanding capital stock.

Within one year following the date of death of a shareholder, or his disqualification as hereinbefore provided, all of the shares of such shareholders shall be transferred to, and acquired by, the corporation or persons qualified to own the shares, if the provisions of subsection B are inapplicable. If no other provision to accomplish this transfer and acquisition is in effect and carried out within this period, the corporation thereafter shall purchase and redeem all of the decedent shareholder’s shares of stock at book value, determined as of the end of the month immediately preceding death or disqualification. The book value shall be determined from the books and records of the corporation in accordance with the generally accepted accounting principles on the accrual method of accounting. No subsequent adjustment of this book value, whether by the corporation itself, by federal income tax audit made and agreed to, or by a court decision which has become final, shall alter the redemption price. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the parties involved from making any other arrangement or provision in the corporate articles, bylaws, or by contract to transfer the shares of a (i) deceased or disqualified shareholder or (ii) disqualified charitable remainder trust to the corporation or to persons qualified to own the shares, whether made before or after (i) the death or disqualification of the shareholder or (ii) the disqualification of a charitable remainder trust, provided that within the one-year period herein specified all the stock involved shall have been so transferred.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1999, c. 100; 2002, c. 77.

The 1999 amendment,

in the last sentence in subsection (c), inserted “(i)” in two places, inserted “or (ii) disqualified charitable remainder trust,” and inserted “or (ii) the disqualification of a charitable remainder trust.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 77 substituted the A through C designators for the (a) through (c) designators; substituted “its corporate existence is terminated” for “dissolved” in subsection A; deleted “exclusive of treasury stock” following “capital stock” twice in subsection B; and substituted “subsection B” for “subsection (b)” in the first sentence of subsection C.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

§ 13.1-553.
Board of directors.

Except as provided in an agreement adopted pursuant to §

13.1-671.1

or

13.1-852.1

that is not in conflict with §

13.1-544

, a professional corporation organized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be governed by a board of directors, which shall have the full management of the business and affairs of the corporation and continuing exclusive authority to make management decisions on its behalf, including the power and authority to delegate to its agents, officers, and employees, and to delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons managerial duties and tasks related to the corporation’s operations, and no shareholder or member shall have the power to bind the corporation within the scope of its business or profession merely by virtue of his being a shareholder or member. To the extent the board of directors is eliminated or its make-up or manner of selection is modified by an agreement adopted pursuant to §

13.1-671.1

or

13.1-852.1

, only individuals or entities licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services within the Commonwealth as the services provided by the professional corporation or its shareholders or members shall supervise and direct the provision of professional services of that professional corporation or its shareholders or members within the Commonwealth; however, in the case of a corporation rendering the services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, landscape architects, or certified interior designers, or any combination thereof, such supervision and direction may be provided by individuals who are employees of the corporation and are not duly licensed to render such professional services so long as at least two-thirds of the individuals providing such supervision and direction are employees of the corporation and duly licensed to render such professional services.

The articles of incorporation may prescribe the manner in which the board of directors shall be chosen and the number thereof. No individual not duly licensed or otherwise duly authorized to render the professional services of the corporation shall be a member of the board of directors, except that the board of directors of a corporation rendering the services of architects, professional engineers, land surveyors, landscape architects, or certified interior designers, or any combination thereof, may have as members employees of the corporation who are not authorized to render the professional services of the corporation, provided that such employee-directors do not constitute more than one-third of all of the members of the board of directors.

The board of directors, including the first board of directors, shall consist of one or more individuals. The number of directors shall be fixed by the bylaws except as to the number of the first board of directors, which shall be fixed by the articles of incorporation. The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment of the bylaws, unless the articles of incorporation provide that a change in the number of directors shall be made only by amendment of the articles of incorporation. In the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, the number shall be the same as that stated in the articles of incorporation.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1978, c. 828; 1982, c. 590; 1995, c. 322; 2006, c. 649; 2007, c. 629; 2009, c. 309; 2010, c. 532.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 649 inserted the second sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 629 inserted “including the power and authority to delegate to its agents, officers, and employees, and to delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons managerial duties and tasks related to the corporation’s operations” preceding “and no shareholder” in the first sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 309 deleted the clause (i) designator preceding “in the case of a corporation,” inserted “or landscape architects” following “land surveyors” and made a related change, deleted clause (ii) which read: “in the case of a corporation rendering the services of certified landscape architects, such supervision and direction may be provided by individuals who are employees of the corporation and are not legally authorized to use the title of certified landscape architect so long as at least two-thirds of the individuals providing such supervision and direction are employees of the corporation and legally authorized to use such a title” and deleted “certified” preceding “landscape architect” and “landscape architects” in the third and fourth sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 532, in subsection A, inserted “or

13.1-852.1

” twice, inserted “or member” following “shareholder” twice, inserted “or members” following “shareholders” twice, and inserted “or certified interior designers” following “landscape architects”; rewrote subsection B; substituted “individuals” for “members” in subsection C; and made related changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-554.
Repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 346.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-554

, relating to state and local revenue licenses, was enacted by Acts 1970, c. 77.

§ 13.1-554.1.
Income and property taxes.

All professional corporations organized or qualifying under the provisions of this chapter, shall be taxed as corporations for income tax purposes and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

58.1-300

et seq.) of Title 58.1, entitled “Income Taxes,” insofar as these provisions are applicable to corporations, and property owned by such corporations shall be taxed in the actual form in which it may exist and not as capital. The provisions of this section shall be effective January 1, 1971.

History.

1972, c. 214.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1338 (1972).

§ 13.1-555.
Merger.

A professional corporation operating pursuant to the terms of this chapter may merge with one or more corporations, limited liability companies, or domestic partnerships only if the surviving corporation, limited liability company, or domestic partnership is a professional corporation, a professional limited liability company, or a domestic partnership all of the partners of which are professional corporations, professional limited liability companies, or individuals duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as those for which the surviving professional corporation, professional limited liability company, or domestic partnership was incorporated or organized.

History.

1970, c. 77; 2008, c. 509.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 rewrote the section, which read: “A professional corporation operating pursuant to the terms of this chapter may consolidate or merge with another corporation only if the professional corporation is the surviving corporation.”

§ 13.1-556.
Application of Chapter 9 or Chapter 10 of this title.

The provisions of Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) or Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), as the case may be, of this title shall be applicable to professional corporations organized under the provisions of this chapter. Where a conflict arises between the provisions found in Chapter 9, or Chapter 10, as the case may be, and this chapter, this chapter shall control.

History.

1970, c. 77; 1972, c. 84; 2000, c. 194.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 194, in the first and second sentences, inserted “or Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), as the case may be.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).